Alabama, session 2026rs, HB83.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. The following amendment to the Constitution
of Alabama of 2022, is proposed:
PROPOSED AMENDMENT
The Judge of Probate of Blount County may exercise
equity jurisdiction concurrent with that of the circuit court
in cases originally filed in the Probate Court of Blount
County if the judge of probate is licensed to practice law in
the State of Alabama. In any case subject to this amendment,
the judge of probate shall possess the power and authority of
a circuit court judge trying the case, and the case shall be
treated in all respects in the same manner as a case filed in
circuit court. The Alabama Rules of Civil Procedure shall
apply in the cases except as otherwise specifically provided
by law. This amendment is self-executing, but the Legislature
may enact additional laws to implement this amendment if
needed.
Upon ratification of this constitutional amendment, the
Code Commissioner shall number and place this amendment as
appropriate in the constitution omitting this instructional
paragraph and may make the following nonsubstantive revisions:
change capitalization, hierarchy, spelling, and punctuation
Page 1

change capitalization, hierarchy, spelling, and punctuation
HB83 Enrolled
for purposes of style and uniformity; correct manifest
grammatical, clerical, and typographical errors; revise
internal or external citations and cross-references; harmonize
language; and translate effective dates.
END PROPOSED AMENDMENT
Section 2. An election upon the proposed amendment
shall be held in accordance with Sections 284, 284.01, and 285
of the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, and the election laws
of this state. The appropriate election official shall assign
a ballot number for the proposed constitutional amendment on
the election ballot and shall set forth the following
description of the substance or subject matter of the proposed
constitutional amendment:
"Relating to Blount County, proposing an amendment to
the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, to authorize the Judge of
Probate of Blount County to exercise equity jurisdiction
concurrent with that of the circuit court in cases originally
filed in the Probate Court of Blount County if the judge of
probate is licensed to practice law in the State of Alabama.
Proposed by Act ____."
This description shall be followed by the following
language:
"Yes( ) No( )."
Section 3. The proposed amendment shall become valid as
part of the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, when approved by
a majority of the qualified electors voting thereon.
Page 2

a majority of the qualified electors voting thereon.
HB83 Enrolled










________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 21-Jan-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 29-Jan-26 Passed



Page 3